District of Columbia statutes.
48-851.04

Rules.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of § 48-851.03. The rules shall specify safe, secure, and environmentally sound methods for health care facilities to dispose of used and unused pharmaceuticals.

(b)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of § 48-851.02.

History

Mar. 5, 2010, D.C. Law 18-112, § 5, 56 DCR 9378

Editor's Notes

Revision of chapter: D.C. Law 4-29 enacted the District of Columbia Uniform Controlled Substances Act of 1981. D.C. Law 4-29 repealed former §§ 33-501, 33-503 to 33-513, 33-515 to 33-520, 33-521(a), (c) through (g), and 33-522 to 33-526 1981 Ed., redesignated former §§ 33-502, 33-514, and 33-521 1981 Ed. as present §§ 48-921.01, 48-921.02, and 48-931.01, respectively, and enacted present §§ 48-901.02, 48-902.01 to 48-902.13, 48-903.01 to 48-903.09, 48-904.01 to 48-904.10, 48-905.01 to 48-905.07, and 48-906.01 to 48-906.03. Former § 33-509 1981 Ed. had been amended by D.C. Law 4-25.

Former §§ 33-501 to 33-526 1981 Ed. as they existed prior to the revision of this chapter by D.C. Law 4-29, were part of the Uniform Narcotic Drug Act, approved June 20, 1938 (52 Stat. 785). D.C. Law 4-29 also repealed, inter alia, the provisions of former chapter 6 of this title, the Dangerous Drug Act for the District of Columbia, approved July 24, 1956 (70 Stat. 612).